Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.050

Advisory board—Members—Compensation.

(1) There is created a state cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring advisory board consisting of a maximum of ten members appointed by the director. These members of the board shall include: A representative of private schools licensed under this chapter; a representative from an approved apprenticeship program conducted in an approved salon/shop; a representative of public vocational technical schools licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is unaffiliated with the cosmetology, hair design, barbering, esthetics, master esthetics, or manicuring industry; and six members who are currently practicing licensees who have been engaged in the practice of manicuring, esthetics, master esthetics, barbering, hair design, or cosmetology for at least three years. Members shall serve a term of three years. Any board member may be removed for just cause. The director may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(2) Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 for each day spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the following state agencies: (a) The workforce training and education coordinating board; (b) the employment security department; (c) the department of labor and industries; (d) the department of health; (e) the department of licensing; and (f) the department of revenue.

[ 2015 c 62 s 3; 2013 c 187 s 3; 2008 c 20 s 3; 2002 c 111 s 4. Prior: 1998 c 245 s 5; 1998 c 20 s 1; 1997 c 179 s 1; 1995 c 269 s 402; 1991 c 324 s 3; 1984 c 208 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.

Findings—1995 c 269: "The legislature finds that the economic opportunities for cosmetologists, barbers, estheticians, and manicurists have deteriorated in this state as a result of the lack of skilled practitioners, inadequate licensing controls, and inadequate enforcement of health standards. To increase the opportunities for individuals to earn viable incomes in these professions and to protect the general health of the public, the state cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, and manicuring advisory board should be reconstituted and given a new charge to develop appropriate responses to this situation, including legislative proposals." [ 1995 c 269 s 401.]

Effective date—1995 c 269: "Sections 101, 201, 302, 303, 401, 402, 501 through 505, 601, 701, 801, 901, 1001, 1101, 1201 through 1203, 1301, 1302, 1401 through 1407, 1501, 1601, 1701, 1801, 1901, 1902, 2001, 2101, 2102, 2201 through 2204, 2301, 2302, 2401, 2501, 2601 through 2608, 2701, 2801 through 2804, 2901 through 2909, 3001, 3101, 3201, 3301, 3401, and 3501 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 269 s 3604.]

Part headings not law—1995 c 269: "Part headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1995 c 269 s 3601.]

Severability—1995 c 269: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 c 269 s 3602.]